Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-8,130
Amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing matches or exhibitions; license; fee.

The State Athletic Commissioner may issue an annual license for conducting amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing matches or exhibitions to any club, association, or organization. Each application for a license shall be accompanied by a fee set by the commissioner in rule and regulation. Such fee shall be not less than twenty-five dollars and not more than one hundred dollars.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 3, p. 1327;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 482, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB869, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB635, § 2.